Wyoming, session 2026, SF0015.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-1-302(h) is amended to read:

23-1-302. Powers and duties.

(h) For purposes of promoting the maintenance of
wildlife habitat and attaining wildlife management
objectives pursuant to W.S. 23-1-103 and in addition to
duties prescribed under paragraph (a)(xiv) of this section,
SF0015

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0176
the commission shall promulgate rules and regulations
governing the issuance of elk, deer, antelope and turkey
hunting licenses to Wyoming landowners without subjection
to prescribed means of competitive public issuance. The
commission may promulgate rules to limit the number of
landowner hunting licenses issued under this subsection in
any limited quota hunt area when deemed necessary to
maintain the public hunting opportunity, provided that not
less than forty percent (40%) of the hunting licenses in a
limited quota hunt area shall be made available to
landowners. The remaining licenses that are not issued to
landowners shall revert to the limited quota hunt area to
be purchased by the public. Fees assessed for licenses
authorized under this subsection shall be equal to fees
prescribed under W.S. 23-2-101(j) for each species for
which the license is issued.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0015